Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2806
Employment rights of employee of sheriff's office.

No person in the employ of the office of the sheriff shall be reduced in rank or pay, suspended, removed, or deprived of any benefits accrued as of July 10, 1984, except as provided in the rules of the merit commission.

Laws 1974, LB 782, § 7;

Laws 1979, LB 396, § 6;

Laws 1984, LB 394, § 6.